Washington statutes.
RCW 9.68.110

Motion picture operator or projectionist exempt, when.

The provisions of RCW 9.68.050 through 9.68.120 shall not apply to acts done in the scope of his or her employment by a motion picture operator or projectionist employed by the owner or manager of a theater or other place for the showing of motion pictures, unless the motion picture operator or projectionist has a financial interest in such theater or place wherein he or she is so employed or unless he or she caused to be performed or exhibited such performance or motion picture without the knowledge and consent of the manager or owner of the theater or other place of showing.

[ 2011 c 336 s 321; 1969 ex.s. c 256 s 19.]

NOTES:

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 256: See note following RCW 9.68.050.